Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.200

Subdivision of retirement system funds.

In the records of the teachers' retirement system the teachers' retirement system plan 1 fund shall be subdivided into the member reserve, the pension reserve, and other funds as may from time to time be created by the director for the purpose of the internal accounting record. The director may adopt rules creating or deleting funds as he or she deems necessary.

[ 1992 c 212 s 2; 1991 c 35 s 32; 1989 c 273 s 16; 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 150 s 1; 1963 ex.s. c 14 s 2; 1955 c 274 s 2; 1947 c 80 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-28. Prior: 1941 c 97 s 2, part; 1937 c 221 s 3, part; 1923 c 187 s 5, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4995-3, part. Formerly RCW 41.32.030.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Effective dates—1982 1st ex.s. c 52: See note following RCW 2.10.180.

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 150: "The provisions of sections 1 through 20 of this 1969 amendatory act shall take effect on July 1, 1969." [ 1969 ex.s. c 150 s 21.]